Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 45
OFFENSES

Section

34-45-101. Damages for taking ore.

In trials for the recovery of the value of ore or minerals wrongfully mined and extracted, if plaintiff shows himself entitled to recover, and if he had the rightful possession of the ground from which the ore was taken at the time the action was brought or tried, the fact that defendant may have been in possession, either actual or constructive, when the case was tried shall not deprive plaintiff from recovering damages for the value of the ore or mineral mined and extracted according to the rules of law pertaining to the trials of actions of that character. But for the purpose of the action, plaintiff shall be deemed and held to be in possession of all the ground, drifts, stopes, openings, and premises from which the ore was taken, although he may not be able to reach such ground from his own openings and workings. The rule of law that plaintiff can recover nominal damages for the first entry, and then wait until he obtains actual possession of the ground from which the ore was taken, and then bring another action for the value of the ore or mineral so mined and taken, shall not be observed nor applied to defeat, in the first action, the recovery of the value of the ore or mineral so wrongfully mined and taken.

Source:

L. 1893:

p. 349, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 4219.

C.L.

§ 3307.

CSA:

C. 110, § 200.

CRS 53:

§ 92-26-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-26-1.

34-45-102. Conspiracy - threats - evidence - penalty. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1874:

p. 192, § 3.

G.L.

§ 1828.

G.S.

§ 2414.

R.S. 08:

§ 4220.

C.L.

§ 3308.

CSA:

C. 110, § 201.

CRS 53:

§ 92-26-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-26-2.

L. 2003:

Entire section repealed, p. 915, § 24, effective August 6.

34-45-103. Killing in entry by force.

If any persons associate and agree to enter by force of numbers, and such number is calculated to inspire terror, or by force and violence, or by threats of violence, against any persons in the actual possession of any lode, gulch, or placer claim, and upon or into such lode, gulch, or placer claim, and upon such entry, any persons are killed, said persons, and each of them, so entering, shall be deemed guilty of murder in the first degree, and punished accordingly. Upon the trial of such cases, any person cognizant of such entry, who shall either be present, aiding and assisting, or shall by promise of money, property, influence, assistance, or other thing of value, in any way encourage such entry, shall be deemed a principal in the commission of said offense.

Source:

L. 1874:

p. 192, § 4.

L. 1876:

p. 94, § 1.

G.L.

§ 1829.

G.S.

§ 2415.

R.S. 08:

§ 4221.

C.L.

§ 3309.

CSA:

C. 110, § 202.

CRS 53:

§ 92-26-3.

L. 63:

p. 339, § 53.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-26-3.

Cross references:

For murder in the first degree, see § 18-3-102.

34-45-104. Removal of trees a misdemeanor. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 460, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 4222.

C.L.

§ 3310.

CSA:

C. 110, § 203.

CRS 53:

§ 92-26-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-26-4.

L. 77:

Entire section repealed, p. 293, § 9, effective May 26.

34-45-105. Removal of cabins. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 460, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 4223.

C.L.

§ 3311.

CSA:

C. 110, § 204.

CRS 53:

§ 92-26-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-26-5.

L. 77:

Entire section repealed, p. 293, § 9, effective May 26.

34-45-106. Who is deemed owner. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 460, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 4224.

C.L.

§ 3312.

CSA:

C. 110, § 205.

CRS 53:

§ 92-26-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-26-6.

L. 77:

Entire section repealed, p. 293, § 9, effective May 26.

34-45-107. Penalty for wrongful removal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 461, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 4225.

C.L.

§ 3313.

CSA:

C. 110, § 206.

CRS 53:

§ 92-26-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-26-7.

L. 77:

Entire section repealed, p. 293, § 9, effective May 26.